Washington statutes.
RCW 38.16.050

Appointment of members of the committee for employer support of the guard and reserve to civil affairs unit.

To assist the state of Washington in the event of mobilization of state and federal military forces in the state, and notwithstanding other provisions of the state military law and other regulations governing appointment and promotion of officers and enlisted personnel of the Washington state guard, members of the Washington committee for employer support of the guard and reserve may be appointed to serve in a civil affairs unit of the Washington state guard. The rank shall be determined by the adjutant general.

[ 1988 c 288 s 17.]